test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NI_A_NoExtra_mashkimod_gt-norm.yaml
     +Px1mashkimod+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: nimashkimodiminiibanag
     +Px1mashkimod+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: nimashkimodiminiibaning
     +Px1mashkimod+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: nimashkimodimini***idig, idog***an
     +Px1mashkimod+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: nimashkimodimini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1mashkimod+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: nimashkimodimini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2mashkimod+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: gimashkimodiminaanibanan
     +Px2mashkimod+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: gimashkimodiminaanibanag
     +Px2mashkimod+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: gimashkimodiminaanibaning
     +Px2mashkimod+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: gimashkimodiminaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2mashkimod+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: gimashkimodiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2mashkimod+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: gimashkimodiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2mashkimod+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: gimashkimodimiwaaibanan
     +Px2mashkimod+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: gimashkimodimiwaaibanag
     +Px2mashkimod+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: gimashkimodimiwaaibaning
     +Px2mashkimod+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: gimashkimodimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2mashkimod+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: gimashkimodimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2mashkimod+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: gimashkimodimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2mashkimod+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: gimashkimodiminiibanan
     +Px2mashkimod+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: gimashkimodiminiibanag
     +Px2mashkimod+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: gimashkimodiminiibaning
     +Px2mashkimod+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: gimashkimodimini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2mashkimod+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: gimashkimodimini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2mashkimod+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: gimashkimodimini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3mashkimod+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: omashkimodiminaanibanan
     +Px3mashkimod+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: omashkimodiminaanibanag
     +Px3mashkimod+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: omashkimodiminaanibaning
     +Px3mashkimod+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: omashkimodiminaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3mashkimod+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: omashkimodiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3mashkimod+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: omashkimodiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3mashkimod+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: omashkimodimiwaaibanan
     +Px3mashkimod+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: omashkimodimiwaaibanag
     +Px3mashkimod+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: omashkimodimiwaaibaning
     +Px3mashkimod+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: omashkimodimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3mashkimod+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: omashkimodimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3mashkimod+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: omashkimodimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3mashkimod+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: omashkimodiminiibanan
     +Px3mashkimod+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: omashkimodiminiibanag
     +Px3mashkimod+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: omashkimodiminiibaning
     +Px3mashkimod+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: omashkimodimini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3mashkimod+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: omashkimodimini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3mashkimod+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: omashkimodimini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 6, 7
     +Px1mashkimod+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: nimashkimodishinaanibanan
     +Px1mashkimod+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: nimashkimodishinaanibanag
     +Px1mashkimod+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: nimashkimodishinaanibaning
     +Px1mashkimod+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: nimashkimodishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px1mashkimod+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: nimashkimodishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1mashkimod+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: nimashkimodishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1mashkimod+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: nimashkimodishiwaaibanan
     +Px1mashkimod+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: nimashkimodishiwaaibanag
     +Px1mashkimod+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: nimashkimodishiwaaibaning
     +Px1mashkimod+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: nimashkimodishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px1mashkimod+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: nimashkimodishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1mashkimod+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: nimashkimodishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1mashkimod+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: nimashkimodishiniibanan
     +Px1mashkimod+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: nimashkimodishiniibanag
     +Px1mashkimod+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: nimashkimodishiniibaning
     +Px1mashkimod+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: nimashkimodishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px1mashkimod+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: nimashkimodishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1mashkimod+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: nimashkimodishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2mashkimod+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: gimashkimodishinaanibanan
     +Px2mashkimod+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: gimashkimodishinaanibanag
     +Px2mashkimod+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: gimashkimodishinaanibaning
     +Px2mashkimod+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: gimashkimodishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2mashkimod+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: gimashkimodishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2mashkimod+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: gimashkimodishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2mashkimod+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: gimashkimodishiwaaibanan
     +Px2mashkimod+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: gimashkimodishiwaaibanag
     +Px2mashkimod+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: gimashkimodishiwaaibaning
     +Px2mashkimod+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: gimashkimodishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2mashkimod+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: gimashkimodishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2mashkimod+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: gimashkimodishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2mashkimod+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: gimashkimodishiniibanan
     +Px2mashkimod+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: gimashkimodishiniibanag
     +Px2mashkimod+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: gimashkimodishiniibaning
     +Px2mashkimod+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: gimashkimodishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2mashkimod+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: gimashkimodishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2mashkimod+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: gimashkimodishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3mashkimod+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: omashkimodishinaanibanan
     +Px3mashkimod+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: omashkimodishinaanibanag
     +Px3mashkimod+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: omashkimodishinaanibaning
     +Px3mashkimod+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: omashkimodishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3mashkimod+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: omashkimodishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3mashkimod+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: omashkimodishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3mashkimod+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: omashkimodishiwaaibanan
     +Px3mashkimod+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: omashkimodishiwaaibanag
     +Px3mashkimod+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: omashkimodishiwaaibaning
     +Px3mashkimod+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: omashkimodishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3mashkimod+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: omashkimodishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3mashkimod+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: omashkimodishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3mashkimod+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: omashkimodishiniibanan
     +Px3mashkimod+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: omashkimodishiniibanag
     +Px3mashkimod+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: omashkimodishiniibaning
     +Px3mashkimod+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: omashkimodishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3mashkimod+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: omashkimodishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3mashkimod+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: omashkimodishini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: mashkimodensimishinaaniban
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: mashkimodensimishinaan***idig, idog***
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: mashkimodensimishiwaaiban
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: mashkimodensimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: mashkimodensimishiniiban
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: mashkimodensimishini***idig, idog***
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: mashkimodenhimishinaaniban
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: mashkimodenhimishinaan***idig, idog***
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: mashkimodenhimishiwaaiban
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: mashkimodenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: mashkimodenhimishiniiban
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: mashkimodenhimishini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5, 7
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: mashkimodensimishinaanan
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: mashkimodensimishinaanag
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: mashkimodensimishinaaning
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: mashkimodensimishiwaaan
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: mashkimodensimishiwaaag
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: mashkimodensimishiwaaing
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: mashkimodensimishinian
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: mashkimodensimishiniag
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: mashkimodensimishiniing
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: mashkimodenhimishinaanan
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: mashkimodenhimishinaanag
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: mashkimodenhimishinaaning
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: mashkimodenhimishiwaaan
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: mashkimodenhimishiwaaag
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: mashkimodenhimishiwaaing
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: mashkimodenhimishinian
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: mashkimodenhimishiniag
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: mashkimodenhimishiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 6, 7
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: mashkimodensimishibanan
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: mashkimodensimishibanag
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: mashkimodensimishibaning
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: mashkimodensimish***idig, idog***an
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: mashkimodensimish***idig, idog***ag
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: mashkimodensimish***idig, idog***ing
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: mashkimodenhimishibanan
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: mashkimodenhimishibanag
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: mashkimodenhimishibaning
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: mashkimodenhimish***idig, idog***an
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: mashkimodenhimish***idig, idog***ag
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: mashkimodenhimish***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 5, 6, 7
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: mashkimodensiminaanibanan
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: mashkimodensiminaanibanag
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: mashkimodensiminaanibaning
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: mashkimodensiminaan***idig, idog***an
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: mashkimodensiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: mashkimodensiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: mashkimodensimiwaaibanan
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: mashkimodensimiwaaibanag
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: mashkimodensimiwaaibaning
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: mashkimodensimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: mashkimodensimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: mashkimodensimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: mashkimodensiminiibanan
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: mashkimodensiminiibanag
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: mashkimodensiminiibaning
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: mashkimodensimini***idig, idog***an
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: mashkimodensimini***idig, idog***ag
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: mashkimodensimini***idig, idog***ing
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: mashkimodenhiminaanibanan
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: mashkimodenhiminaanibanag
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: mashkimodenhiminaanibaning
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: mashkimodenhiminaan***idig, idog***an
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: mashkimodenhiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: mashkimodenhiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: mashkimodenhimiwaaibanan
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: mashkimodenhimiwaaibanag
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: mashkimodenhimiwaaibaning
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: mashkimodenhimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: mashkimodenhimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: mashkimodenhimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: mashkimodenhiminiibanan
